Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1636.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "sporting event" in section 13C01 of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 13C01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"E-Sports event." An organized competition involving video games in which players compete against each other, individually or as teams, and the dominant element in determining the results is the relative skill of the players.* * *123456789101112131415161718 "Sporting event." A professional or collegiate sports or athletic event [or], a motor race event[.], an e-Sports event or any other competition or event of any kind approved for sports wagering by the board . * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1636PN1986 - 2 - 123456